Maryland, session 2026, HB1340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
SUBTITLE 42. PRISON EDUCATION DELIVERY REFORM COMMISSION.
9–4201.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “COMMISSION” MEANS THE PRISON EDUCATION
DELIVERY REFORM COMMISSION.
9–4202.
(A) (1) THERE IS A PRISON EDUCATION DELIVERY REFORM
COMMISSION ESTABLISHED AS AN INDEPENDENT UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1340*

HOUSE BILL 1340
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE COMMISSION IS TO DEVELOP
RECOMMENDATIONS FOR THE OPTIMAL DELIVERY OF EDUCATION TO INDIVIDUALS
SUBJECT TO THE CRIMINAL AND JUVENILE JUSTICE SYSTEMS TO INCREASE PUBLIC
SAFETY AND REDUCE RECIDIVISM.
(B) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) THREE MEMBERS OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, APPOINTED BY
THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(2) THREE MEMBERS OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, APPOINTED BY
THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(3) THE SECRETARY OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(4) THE SECRETARY OF JUVENILE SERVICES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(5) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S
DESIGNEE;
(6) THE PUBLIC DEFENDER OF MARYLAND, OR THE PUBLIC
DEFENDER’S DESIGNEE;
(7) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND JUDICIARY, APPOINTED
BY THE CHIEF JUSTICE OF THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND;
(8) THE SECRETARY OF THE MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION
COMMISSION, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(9) THE SECRETARY OF LABOR, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(10) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS, OR THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE; AND
(11) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR:
(I) A NATIONAL EXPERT ON CORRECTIONAL EDUCATION
ISSUES;

HOUSE BILL 1340 3
(II) A REPRESENTATIVE OF A FOUNDATION WITH EXPERTISE IN
CORRECTIONAL EDUCATION SYSTEMS;
(III) A REPRESENTATIVE OF LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCIES;
(IV) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND STATE’S
ATTORNEYS’ ASSOCIATION;
(V) A REPRESENTATIVE OF AN ADULT PRISON SERVICES
PROVIDER BUREAU;
(VI) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM A RESTORATIVE JUSTICE
ORGANIZATION;
(VII) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE GOUCHER COLLEGE
PRISON EDUCATION PARTNERSHIP;
(VIII) A REPRESENTATIVE OF MARYLAND CORRECTIONAL
ENTERPRISES; AND
(IX) TWO INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE OR WERE UNDER THE
SUPERVISION OF THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION.
(C) (1) THE TERM OF AN APPOINTED MEMBER IS 4 YEARS.
(2) THE TERMS OF THE APPOINTED MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS
REQUIRED BY THE TERMS PROVIDED FOR MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION ON JUNE
1, 2026.
(3) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL
A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(4) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
(5) AN APPOINTED MEMBER WHO SERVES TWO CONSECUTIVE FULL
4–YEAR TERMS MAY NOT BE REAPPOINTED FOR 4 YEARS AFTER COMPLETION OF
THOSE TERMS.
(D) THE GOVERNOR SHALL DESIGNATE THE CHAIR OF THE COMMISSION.

HOUSE BILL 1340
(E) THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME PREVENTION AND POLICY SHALL
PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE COMMISSION.
(F) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(G) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) CONVENE AN ADVISORY STAKEHOLDER GROUP THAT INCLUDES
ORGANIZATIONS WITH EXPERIENCE IN:
(I) CRIMINAL JUSTICE POLICY REFORM;
(II) ADVOCATING FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH LEARNING
DISABILITIES AND THOSE FROM MARGINALIZED COMMUNITIES;
(III) RESTORATIVE JUSTICE; AND
(IV) PEER RECOVERY AND SUPPORT SERVICES;
(2) WORK WITH THE ADVISORY STAKEHOLDER GROUP, INCLUDING
CONDUCTING ROUNDTABLE DISCUSSION FORUMS SEEKING PUBLIC INPUT IN ALL
GEOGRAPHIC REGIONS OF THE STATE;
(3) DEVELOP AN EDUCATION–FOCUSED STATEWIDE FRAMEWORK OF
POLICIES TO INVEST IN STRATEGIES TO INCREASE PUBLIC SAFETY AND REDUCE
RECIDIVISM OF ADULT OFFENDERS, USING A DATA–DRIVEN APPROACH;
(4) RESEARCH BEST PRACTICES FOR THE PRIMARY, SECONDARY,
POSTSECONDARY, AND CAREER OR VOCATIONAL EDUCATION OF THOSE WHO ARE
SUBJECT TO THE CRIMINAL AND JUVENILE JUSTICE SYSTEMS;
(5) IDENTIFY MEASURES TO MITIGATE RISK FACTORS THAT
CONTRIBUTE TO ADULT CONTACT WITH THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE SYSTEM, WITH A
FOCUS ON EDUCATION;
(6) EVALUATE CURRENT WORKFORCE PROGRAMS IN WHICH
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS PARTICIPATE AND THE PROGRAMS’ EFFECTIVENESS

HOUSE BILL 1340 5
IN TRAINING FOR EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITIES THAT RESULT IN LIVING WAGES;
AND
(7) REQUEST TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE FROM:
(I) THE ABELL FOUNDATION;
(II) THE ANNIE E. CASEY FOUNDATION;
(III) THE COUNCIL OF STATE GOVERNMENTS;
(IV) THE VERA INSTITUTE OF JUSTICE;
(V) THE COALITION ON ADULT BASIC EDUCATION;
(VI) THE RAND CORPORATION; AND
(VII) OTHER ORGANIZATIONS SIMILAR TO THE ORGANIZATIONS
LISTED UNDER ITEMS (I) THROUGH (VI) OF THIS ITEM.
(H) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, AND EACH JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER,
THE COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT AN ANNUAL REPORT OF THE COMMISSION’S
ACTIVITIES, FINDINGS, AND RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
SECTION 2. AND IT BE FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the appointed
members of the Prison Education Delivery Commission who are members of the
Commission on the effective date of Section 1 of this Act or initially appointed after the
effective date shall expire as follows:
(1) five members in 2027;
(2) six members in 2028; and
(3) six members in 2029.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.